Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.205

When amendment becomes effective—Existing actions and rights not affected.

Upon the filing of the articles of amendment by the secretary of state, the amendment shall become effective as provided in RCW 23.95.210 and the articles of incorporation shall be deemed to be amended accordingly.

No amendment shall affect any existing cause of action in favor of or against such corporation, nor any pending action to which such corporation shall be a party, nor the existing rights of persons other than members; and, in the event the corporate name shall be changed by amendment, no action brought by or against such corporation under its former name shall abate for that reason.

[ 2015 c 176 s 4111; 1982 c 35 s 132; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 41.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.